New York, session 2025-2026, A10297.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The labor law is amended by adding a new section 202-m to 2 read as follows: 3 § 202-m. Leave of absence for colon cancer screenings granted to 4 employees. 1. An employer shall grant four hours of leave of absence in 5 any twelve month period to an employee who seeks to undergo colon cancer 6 screenings. 7 2. An employer shall not retaliate against an employee for requesting 8 or obtaining a leave of absence under this section. 9 3. This section shall not prevent an employer from providing leave for 10 colon cancer screenings in addition to leave allowed under any other 11 provision of law. This section shall not affect an employee's rights 12 with respect to any other employee benefit otherwise provided by law. 13 4. The commissioner is hereby authorized and directed to establish any 14 necessary guidelines, including requirements for notice, request and 15 approval of leave, and documentation, for the timely implementation of 16 the program. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14556-01-6